District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-4508

Residency requirement.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 31, 2001, D.C. Law 13-212, § 2(b), 47 DCR 9457
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2402(h), 49 DCR 11664

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(e) of College Savings Program Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-186, October 1, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9244).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2402(h) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(e) of College Savings Program Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-374, May 20, 2002, 49 DCR 5114).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2402(h) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2402(h) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).